West Virginia, session 2025, HB2559.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. STATE ROAD FUND. §17-3-2. Payment of state road costs from moneys received by commission. (a) The cost and expense of the construction, reconstruction, improvement, or maintenance of all state roads and other authorized state road purposes shall be paid out of any moneys received by or appropriated to the state road commission Commissioner of the Division of Highways for that purpose. The commissioner may transfer spending authority between appropriation lines within the State Road Fund's annual budget to meet obligations when previously forecasted spending needs are insufficient. (b) The Division of Highways shall report annually, or as requested, to the Governor and to the Joint Legislative Commission of the Department of Transportation Accountability on all uses of the transfer of spending authority, including the name of the funds from which and into which spending authority was transferred; the amounts transferred; the date of transfer; the reasons for the transfers.